en: Paprika
af: Paprika
bg: Паприка
br: Paprika
cy: Paprica
de: Paprikapulver
eo: Papriko
es: Pimentón
fi: paprika
fr: Paprika
hr: Paprika
io: Papriko
it: paprica
ja: パプリカ
lt: Paprika
nl: Paprikapoeder
nn: Paprika
pl: Papryka
pt: Páprica
ro: Boia
sl: Paprika
sv: Paprikapulver

en: Peppers
bg: Пипер
da: Peber
de: Pfeffer
es: Pimienta
fi: paprikat
fr: Poivres
hr: Paprike
it: Pepe
ja: 胡椒, コショウ, こしょう
la: Piper nigrum
lt: Pipirai
nb: Peppere, Peprer
nl: Pepers
nn: Peparar
pl: Pieprz
pt: Pimentas
ru: Перцы
sv: Peppar

en: Pepper variety packs
de: Gemüsepaprikamischpackungen
es: Surtidos de pimientos
fr: Assortiments de poivrons et piments
hr: Pakiranja sorti paprike
it: Confezioni miste di peperoni
nl: Assortimenten van paprika en pepers
pt: Packs variados de pimentos

en: Ground peppers, Ground peppercorns
bg: Млян пипер
de: Gemahlene Paprikaschoten
es: Pimienta molida
fi: rouhitut pippurit
fr: Poivres moulus
hr: Mljevene paprike
it: Pepe macinato
lt: Malti pipirai
nl: Gemalen pepers
pl: Pieprz mielony

en: Peppercorns, Whole peppercorns
da: Peberkorn, Hele peberkorn
de: Pfefferkörner
es: Pimienta en grano
fi: Pippurit
fr: Graines de poivre
hr: Papar u zrnu
it: Grani di pepe
lt: Pipirų žirneliai
nb: Pepperkorn
nl: Peperkorrels
nn: Peparkorn
pl: Ziarna pieprzu
sv: Pepparkorn, Hela pepparkorn

en: Dried peppercorns
da: Tørrede peberkorn
es: Pimienta en grano seco
fr: Graines de poivre déshydraté
hr: Sušeni papar u zrnu
lt: Džiovinti pipirų žirneliai
nl: Gedroogde peperkorrels
sv: Torkade pepparkorn

en: Fresh peppercorns
da: Friske peberkorn
es: Pimienta en grano fresca
fr: Poivre fraîche en grains
hr: Zrna svježeg papra
lt: Švieži pipirų žirneliai
nl: Verse peperkorrels
sv: Färska pepparkorn

en: Black peppers
bg: Черен пипер
de: Schwarzer Pfeffer
es: Pimienta negra
fi: mustapippurit
fr: Poivres noirs
hr: crni papar
it: Pepe nero
ja: 黒胡椒, 黒コショウ, 黒こしょう, ブラックペッパー
lt: Juodieji pipirai
nl: Zwarte pepers
pl: Czarny pieprz
ru: перец-чёрный
sv: Svartpeppar

en: Black peppercorns
de: Schwarze Pfefferkörner
es: Pimienta negra en grano
fr: Poivre noir en grains
hr: Zrna crnog papra
it: Grani di pepe nero
lt: Juodieji pipirų žirneliai
nl: Zwarte peperkorrels
pl: Ziarna pieprzu czarnego

en: Ground black peppers, Black pepper powder
de: Pfeffer schwarz gemahlen
es: Pimienta negra en polvo
fi: rouhitut mustapippurit
fr: Poivre noir moulu, Poivre noir en poudre
hr: Mljevene crne paprike
lt: Malti juodieji pipirai
nl: Gemalen zwarte pepers
pl: Pieprz czarny mielony

en: Coarsely ground black peppers
sv: Grovmalen svartpeppar

en: Grounded grey peppers, Grey pepper powder, Grouned grey peppers
fr: Poivre gris moulu, Poivre gris en poudre
hr: Mljevene sive paprike
lt: Malti pilkieji pipirai

en: Red peppers
fr: Poivres rouges

km: ម្រេចកំពត, Mrech Kampot
fr: Poivre de Kampot

en: Green peppers
bg: Зелен пипер
de: Grüne Peperoni
es: Pimienta verde
fr: Poivres verts
hr: Zelene paprike
ja: 青胡椒, 青コショウ, 青こしょう, グリーンペッパー
lt: Žalieji pipirai
nl: Groene pepers
pl: Pieprz zielony

en: Green peppercorns
de: Grüne Pfefferkörner, grüner Pfeffer ganz
es: Pimienta verde en grano
fr: Poivre vert en grains
hr: Zeleni papar u zrnu
lt: Žalieji pipirų žirneliai
nl: Groene peperkorrels

en: Dried green peppercorns
es: Pimienta verde en grano seca
fr: Poivre vert déshydraté en grains
hr: Sušeni zeleni papar u zrnu
lt: Džiovinti žalieji pipirų žirneliai
nl: Gedroogde groene peperkorrels

en: Fresh green peppercorns
es: Pimienta verde en grano fresca
fr: Poivre vert fraîche en grains
hr: Zrna svježeg zelenog papra
lt: Švieži žalieji pipirų žirneliai
nl: Verse groene peperkorrels

en: Lyophilized green peppercorns
es: Pimienta verde en grano liofilizada
fr: Poivre vert lyophilisé en grains
hr: Liofilizirani zeleni papar u zrnu
lt: Šalčiu džiovinti žalieji pipirų žirneliai
nl: Gevriesdroogde groene peperkorrels

en: Pickled green peppercorns
es: Pimienta verde en grano encurtida
fr: Poivre vert en saumure
hr: Ukiseljeni zeleni papar u zrnu
lt: Marinuoti žalieji pipirų žirneliai